Idaho, session 2026, S1297.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 48, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 21, Title 48, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 21
CONVERSATIONAL AI SAFETY ACT
48-2101. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Conversational AI Safety Act."
48-2102. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Account holder" means an individual who has or opens an account or
profile to use a conversational AI service.
(2)(a) "Conversational AI service" means an artificial intelligence
software application, web interface, or computer program that is ac-
cessible to the general public and that primarily simulates human con-
versation and interaction through textual, visual, or aural communica-
tions.
(b) "Conversational AI service" does not include a software applica-
tion, web interface, or computer program that is any of the following:
(i) Primarily designed and marketed for use by developers or re-
searchers;
(ii) A feature within another software application, web inter-
face, or computer program that is not a conversational AI service;
(iii) A chatbot that is a feature of a video game that is limited to
replies related to the video game and that does not discuss topics
related to mental health, self-harm, or material harmful to minors
or maintain a dialogue on other topics unrelated to the video game;
(iv) Designed to provide outputs relating to a narrow and discrete
topic;
(v) Primarily designed and marketed for commercial use by busi-
ness entities, including those whose primary intended users are
employees, contractors, or clients of business entities, whether
delivered via cloud, on premises, or hybrid deployments;


(vi) Designed to function as a speaker and voice command inter-
face or voice-activated virtual assistant for a consumer elec-
tronic device;
(vii) Used by a business solely for internal purposes;
(viii) Accessible only to individuals who have entered into a com-
mercial agreement, enterprise contract, or similar business ar-
rangement with the operator; or
(ix) A chatbot used only for customer service, a business's op-
erational purposes, productivity purposes, or analysis related to
source information, internal research, or technical assistance.
(3) "Individual" means a natural person.
(4) "Minor" means an individual under circumstances where an operator
has actual knowledge or reasonable certainty that the individual is under
eighteen (18) years of age.
(5) "Minor account holder" means an account holder who is a minor.
(6) "Operator" means a person who makes available a conversational AI
service to the public. Operator does not include mobile application stores
or search engines solely because they provide access to a conversational AI
service.
(7) "Person" means a natural person or legal entity.
(8) "Sexually explicit conduct" and "visual depiction" have the same
meanings as provided in 18 U.S.C. 2256.
48-2103. OPERATOR REQUIREMENTS. (1) If reasonable persons would be
misled to believe that they are interacting with a human, an operator shall
clearly and conspicuously disclose that the conversational AI service is
artificial intelligence.
(2) An operator shall adopt a protocol for the conversational AI ser-
vice to respond to user prompts regarding suicidal ideation that includes
but is not limited to making reasonable efforts to provide a response to
users that refers them to crisis service providers such as a suicide hotline,
crisis text line, or other appropriate crisis services.
(3) An operator shall not knowingly and intentionally cause or program
a conversational AI service to make any representation or statement that ex-
plicitly indicates that the conversational AI service is designed to provide
professional mental or behavioral health care.
48-2104. OPERATOR REQUIREMENTS -- MINORS. (1) An operator shall
clearly and conspicuously disclose to minor account holders that they are
interacting with artificial intelligence:
(a) As a persistent visible disclaimer; or
(b) Both:
(i) At the beginning of each session; and
(ii) Appearing at least every three (3) hours in a continuous con-
versational AI service interaction.
(2) Where an operator knows or has reasonable certainty that an account
holder is a minor, the operator shall not provide the user with points or
similar rewards at unpredictable intervals with the intent to encourage in-
creased engagement with the conversational AI service.


(3) For minor account holders, an operator shall institute reasonable
measures to prevent the conversational AI service from:
(a) Producing visual material of sexually explicit conduct;
(b) Generating direct statements that the account holder should engage
in sexually explicit conduct; or
(c) Generating statements that sexually objectify the account holder.
(4) For minor account holders, an operator shall institute reasonable
measures to prevent a conversational AI service from generating statements
that would lead reasonable persons to believe that they are interacting with
a human, including:
(a) Explicit claims that the conversational AI service is sentient or
human;
(b) Statements that simulate emotional dependence;
(c) Statements that simulate romantic or sexual innuendos; or
(d) Role-playing of adult-minor romantic relationships.
(5) An operator shall offer tools for account holders and, where such
account holders are under thirteen (13) years of age, their parents or
guardians, to manage the account holder's privacy and account settings. An
operator shall also offer related tools to the parents or guardians of minor
account holders thirteen (13) years of age and older, as appropriate based on
relevant risks.
48-2105. PENALTIES AND ENFORCEMENT. (1) An operator that violates the
provisions of this chapter shall be subject to an injunction and liable for
civil penalties of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, not to ex-
ceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per operator, or actual dam-
ages, whichever is greater.
(2) Civil penalties for violations of the provisions of this chapter
are to be sought by the attorney general. Nothing in this chapter shall be
construed as creating a private right of action to enforce the provisions of
this chapter or to support a private right of action under any other law.
(3) This chapter shall not create liability for the developer of an AI
model for any violation of this chapter by a conversational AI system that is
made available to the public by a third-party operator.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after July
1, 2027.